Maryland, session 2026, HB1082.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
4–212.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Contract capacity” means the amount of monthly peak load
requirements:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1082*

HOUSE BILL 1082
(i) that is mutually agreed to by an electric company and a large
load customer for each month remaining in a contract term after the load ramp period has
ended; and
(ii) for which:
1. the electric company agrees to provide all of the
components of retail electric service subject to the terms and conditions in its tariffs; and
2. the large load customer agrees to purchase service at that
load level for the stated term of the contract and under the same terms and conditions as
those stated in the contract.
(3) “DATA CENTER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 11–239 OF THE
TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE.
[(3)] (4) “Large load customer” means a commercial or industrial
customer for retail electric service that:
(i) 1. has or is projected to have an aggregate monthly demand
of at least 100 megawatts; and
[(ii)] 2. has or is projected to have a load factor of over 80%; OR
(II) IS A DATA CENTER.
[(4)] (5) “Load ramp period” means the period of time from
commencement of service until a large load customer’s billing calculation is based on the
full contract capacity.
(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly that residential retail electric
customers in the State should not bear the financial risks associated with large load
customers interconnecting to the electric system serving the State.
(c) (1) (i) On or before [September 1, 2026] JANUARY 1, 2027, each
investor–owned electric company and each electric cooperative shall submit to the
Commission for approval a specific rate schedule for large load customers that accomplishes
the intent of subsection (b) of this section.
(ii) Each municipal electric utility that receives an application for
retail electric service from a large load customer shall submit to the Commission for
approval a specific rate schedule for large load customers.
(2) (i) [Service] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH, SERVICE under a specific rate schedule shall be available to large load
customers that will use, within the initial contract term:

HOUSE BILL 1082 3
1. a monthly maximum demand of more than 100 megawatts
at a single location; or
2. an aggregated contract capacity in the electric company’s
service territory of more than 100 megawatts.
(II) SERVICE UNDER A SPECIFIC RATE SCHEDULE SHALL BE
AVAILABLE TO A DATA CENTER REGARDLESS OF THE MONTHLY MAXIMUM DEMAND
OR THE AGGREGATED CONTRACT CAPACITY OF THE DATA CENTER WITHIN THE
INITIAL CONTRACT TERM.
[(ii)] (III) Except as provided in subparagraph [(iii)] (IV) of this
paragraph, large load customers that qualify for a specific rate schedule after the effective
date of that schedule:
1. shall take service under the specific rate schedule; and
2. may not be allowed to take service under any other
existing schedule.
[(iii)] (IV) A specific rate schedule does not apply to the facility of an
existing large load customer that has signed a service agreement before the effective date
of the schedule if:
1. the large load customer’s existing load does not expand by
more than 25 megawatts at that facility under the existing service agreement; or
2. the large load customer IS NOT A DATA CENTER AND does
not sign a new service agreement to expand the facility’s load by more than 25 megawatts
above the contract capacity of the existing service agreement.
(d) In making a determination on whether to approve a specific rate schedule
submitted under subsection (c) of this section, the Commission shall consider whether the
rate schedule:
(1) requires a large load customer to cover the just and reasonable costs
associated with any electric transmission or distribution system buildout required to:
(i) interconnect the large load customer to the electric system
serving the State; or
(ii) serve the large load customer;
(2) protects residential retail electric customers from the financial risks
associated with large load customers through the use of:

HOUSE BILL 1082
(i) load ramp periods;
(ii) minimum billing demand for electric distribution and
transmission service that is a high percentage of a large load customer’s contract capacity;
(iii) long–term contractual commitments and exit fees;
(iv) guarantee or collateral requirements; and
(v) penalties and reimbursement requirements for the large load
customer if the large load customer delays or cancels a project after the electric company
has begun buildout to accommodate the large load customer; and
(3) sufficiently ensures that the allocation of costs to large load customers
under the schedule does not result in customers that are not large load customers
unreasonably subsidizing the costs of large load customers under the schedule.
(e) Before signing a contract for service under a specific rate schedule submitted
under subsection (c) of this section, a large load customer under the schedule is required
to:
(1) submit a request for a load study to determine the necessary contract
capacity for the large load customer and pay any applicable fees associated with the study;
(2) designate a specific site where the large load customer’s project will be
constructed and served by the electric company;
(3) own or have the exclusive right to use the land designated in item (2) of
this subsection for the project; and
(4) meet any other requirements specified under the rate schedule.
(f) (1) On or before [June] OCTOBER 1, 2026, the Commission shall adopt
regulations to carry out this section.
(2) The regulations shall:
(i) establish minimum notice requirements and deadlines related to
load study requests and contract terminations and adjustments;
(ii) if considered necessary by the Commission, specify common
forms of acceptable collateral to satisfy the requirements of this section; and
(iii) establish deadlines related to completion of load studies and
payment of fees.

HOUSE BILL 1082 5
Article – Tax – General
11–239.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Data center” means a building or group of buildings used to house
computer systems, computer storage equipment, and associated infrastructure that
businesses or other organizations use to organize, process, store, and disseminate large
amounts of data.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.